Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 45.1 Career and Technical Education
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-45.1-1.
Findings.

The general assembly finds and declares as follows:

The Rhode Island economy will benefit from a highly skilled workforce;

Career and technical education must be informed by the needs of local businesses industries and employers, in creating, growing, and locating employment opportunities for job seekers with the requisite knowledge, skills, and abilities desired by employers;

Career and technical education should provide an integrated career pathway system to respond to the needs of businesses, small and large, as well as innovative and emerging industries; and

Based upon the current and future demands for a highly skilled workforce, career and technical education should provide a foundation for students to succeed in career and/or higher education opportunities.

There is a need to establish a coordinated and comprehensive system of career and technical education for students within the state with a focus on coordination, efficiencies, quality of program offerings, and outcomes throughout the state.

There is a need to establish a robust, student-based system of career and technical education that provides a blend of rigorous academics and the skills, training, and credentials necessary for workplace success. Therefore, effective January 30, 2015, there is hereby established a Rhode Island career and technical board of trustees to be known as the Rhode Island board of trustees on career and technical education. Effective January 15, 2015, there is hereby created a not-for-profit organization known as the CTE trust.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 410, § 1.

16-45.1-2.
Career and technical education system.

The board of education shall establish and maintain a system of career and technical education that maintains ongoing connections with higher education and meets the needs of local business and industry, and promotes workforce development.

The board of education shall also create, subject to §§

16-45.1-1

and

16-45.1-2(a)

, a career and technical board of trustees that shall be responsible for ensuring a comprehensive and coordinated career and technical system with the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 225, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 410, § 1.

16-45.1-3.
Report to the general assembly.

Beginning on January 1, 2012, the department of elementary and secondary education shall provide the senate president and speaker of the house an annual report consisting of the following:

The total number of students attending career and technical schools/programs, where determinable;

The total number of those students in subsection (1) who have received diplomas;

The total number of those students in subsection (1) who have received industry recognized certificates, if the information is available;

The total number of students who transfer to another school and/or continue their secondary education;

The total number of students who obtain employment before or immediately after graduation;

The total number of students who attend post-secondary institutions;

The retention rate within each program from year to year;

Progress on developing a plan to study the number of students who find employment in the field studied at three (3) and five (5) years intervals post-graduation;

The cost per pupil per program per year; and

The number of special education students per program.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 225, § 1.